Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-105
Powers.

(RULLCA 105) A limited liability company
has the capacity to sue and be sued in its own name and the power to do all
things necessary or convenient to carry on its activities, including the power
to render a professional service within or without this state.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 5.